Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-613
Commercial bribery and breach of duty to act disinterestedly; penalty.

(1) A person commits a Class I misdemeanor if he or she solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit as consideration for knowingly violating or agreeing to violate a duty of fidelity to which he or she is subject as:

(a) Agent or employee; or

(b) Trustee, guardian, or other fiduciary; or

(c) Lawyer, physician, accountant, appraiser, or other professional advisor; or

(d) Officer, director, partner, limited liability company member, manager, or other participant in the direction of the affairs of an incorporated or unincorporated association; or

(e) Duly elected or appointed representative or trustee of a labor organization or employee of a welfare trust fund; or

(f) Arbitrator or other purportedly disinterested adjudicator or referee.

(2) A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as being engaged in the business of making disinterested selection, appraisal, or criticism of commodities, property, or services commits a Class I misdemeanor if he or she solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit to alter, modify, or change his or her selection, appraisal, or criticism.

(3) A person commits a Class I misdemeanor if he or she confers or offers or agrees to confer any benefit the acceptance of which would be an offense under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 135;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 177;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 54.